Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10-211.3] Commercial general
liability extended reporting requirements. Any policy for commercial
general liability coverage wherein the insurer shall offer and the insured may
elect to purchase an extended reporting period for claims arising during the
expiring policy period shall provide that:

(1) In the event of a cancellation, there shall be a
thirty-day period during which the insured may elect to purchase coverage for
the extended reporting period;

(2) The limit of liability in the policy aggregate
for the extended reporting period shall be one hundred per cent of the expiring
policy aggregate; and

(3) The insurer shall provide the following loss
information to the first named insured within thirty days of the insured's
request or upon any notice of cancellation or nonrenewal:

(A) All information on closed claims
including the date and description of occurrence and amount of payments, if
any;

(B) All information on open claims including
the date and description of occurrence, amount of payment, if any, and amount
of reserves, if any; and

(C) All information on notices of occurrence
including the date and description of occurrence and amount of resources, if
any. [L 2006, c 189, §1]

Revision Note

Subsection designation deleted pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next